Utah statutes.
41-1a-710.   Certificate of origin required for acquisition or resale of vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

(1)  A dealer may not acquire a new  vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor without obtaining a manufacturer's or importer's certificate of origin.

(2)  A manufacturer, importer, dealer, or other person may not sell or otherwise dispose of a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor for purposes of resale without delivering a manufacturer's or importer's certificate of origin to the purchaser or the new owner.

(3)  The division may prescribe uniform standards for the size and content of certificates of origin.

